Hawaii, session 2026, GM1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 92-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows:
3 "(d) A quorum for a meeting of a neighborhood board or
4 community outreach board shall be required for:
5 (1) Conducting official board business;
6 (2) Discussions before and related to voting; and
7 (3) Voting required to validate an act of the board as
8 part of official board business[—]£
9 provided that, if a neighborhood board overseen by a
10 neighborhood commission of the city and county of Honolulu has a
11 vacancy, notwithstanding section 92-15, a majority of the filled
12 seats on the neighborhood board shall constitute a quorum for
13 the purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2).
14 A neighborhood board or community outreach board may
15 receive information or testimony on a matter of official board
16 business without a quorum; provided that the board shall not
17 make a decision on the issue. The board members, at the next
2026-2450 SB2397 CDl SMA-l.docx
UllllillllEiniilEIGIlSHlIillllHEIIDI

Page 2
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
1 meeting of the board, shall report the matters presented as
2 information or testimony."
3 SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
4 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
5 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
2026-2450 SB2397 CDl SMA-l.docx 2
MiMiinniimiiiam

S.B. NO 2397
W
X
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 3rd day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2397, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
90-26

SB No. 2397, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives